Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB959.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1202 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended to read:Section 1202. Forms for Health Insurance Claims.--(a) Each health insurance claim form processed or otherwise used by an insurer, including those used by the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services for public health care coverage, shall be the uniform claim form developed by the department. The claim 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 form shall be identical in form and content except as provided in subsection (c). The department shall, in consultation with the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services, insurers and health care providers or their representatives, first consider the feasibility of utilizing the UB-82/HCFA-1450 and HCFA-1500 forms, or their successors, as a uniform claim form. If these forms are deemed to be unsatisfactory, the department shall, in consultation with the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services, insurers and health care providers or their representatives, develop a uniform claim form for use by all insurers, the Department of [Public Welfare's] Human Services' public health care coverage program and health care providers. The uniform claim form shall contain blank spaces at appropriate places in the document for approved additional information requests under subsection (c).(b) The feasibility study and subsequent development of the uniform claim form shall be complete within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this article. All insurers, the Department of [Public Welfare's] Human Services' public health care coverage program and health care providers shall be required to use the uniform claim form within one hundred twenty (120) days after the uniform claim form is developed. The department may consider a request from the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services for an extension in meeting the implementation schedule of this section.(c) (1) Subject to the procedure contained in clause (2), an insurer may request that a claimant provide departmentally approved additional information which is not requested on the uniform claim form.(2) An insurer may request departmental approval of 20250SB0959PN1078 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional information requests to be printed in the blank spaces on the uniform claim form, and on subsequent pages if necessary, by submitting a written request to the department. Such a request shall be deemed approved by the department if not disapproved within sixty (60) days after receipt of the request. A disapproval shall be subject to the procedures under 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(3) If, in a dental claim form, an insured specifically authorizes payment of benefits directly to an entity or person who provided dental services in accordance with the provisions of the policy, the insurer shall make the payment to the specific provider of the dental services. The insurance contract may not prohibit, and claim forms must provide an option for, the payment of benefits directly to the specified provider of the dental service. The insurer may require written attestation of the assignment of the payment. Payment to the specific provider of the dental services from the insurer shall be the same amount that the insurer would otherwise have paid without the assignment of payment.(4) Clause (3) shall expire upon publication of the notice under subsection (f).(d) In the case of vision and dental claim forms and in the case of supplemental major medical claim forms, utilization of the uniform claim form shall be at the discretion of the individual insurer.(e) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall perform the following duties:(1) Conduct a study that examines:(i) The costs and benefits associated with the direct reimbursement of nonparticipating providers by health insurance 20250SB0959PN1078 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 carriers under a valid assignment of payment as provided under subsection (c)(3).(ii) The impact on consumers of prohibiting health insurance carriers from refusing to accept a valid assignment of payment as provided under subsection (c)(3).(iii) The impact of requiring direct reimbursement of nonparticipating providers by health insurance carriers on a health insurance carrier's ability to maintain an adequate number of providers in the health insurance carrier's network.(iv) Whether there has been a decrease in network participation of ten per centum (10%) or greater than the median fluctuation rate of dental network participation over the previous ten (10) years. If there has been such a decrease, that fact shall be included as a finding in the report required under clause (2).(2) Present a report on the study under clause (1) to the Insurance Commissioner, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives no later than thirty-six (36) months after the effective date of this subsection.(f) If the report of the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee under subsection (e) includes a finding that there has been a decrease in network participation of ten per centum (10%) or greater than the median fluctuation rate of dental network participation over the previous ten (10) years, the Insurance Commissioner shall, within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the report from the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee, transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania 20250SB0959PN1078 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bulletin.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0959PN1078 - 5 - 12